apertium-ga-gd.gd.dix
    <pardef n="obra/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="l/atha-breith__n">
      <e><p><l>atha-breith</l><r>atha-breith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atha-breith</l><r>atha-breith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àithean-breith</l><r>atha-breith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àithean-breith</l><r>atha-breith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="co-èign/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="/òrd__n">
      <e><p><l>òrd</l><r>òrd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ùird</l><r>òrd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ùird</l><r>òrd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ùird</l><r>òrd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="tog__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ail</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aile</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aibh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="bòrd"><par n="initial-b"/><i></i><par n="/òrd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="còrd"><par n="initial-c"/><i></i><par n="/òrd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="latha-breith"><par n="initial-l"/><i></i><par n="l/atha-breith__n"/></e>
    <e lm="co-èignich"><i>co-èign</i><par n="co-èign/ich__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obraich"><i>obra</i><par n="obra/ich__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tog"><i>tog</i><par n="tog__vblex"/></e>
